Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PURPOSE AND FINDINGS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Purpose. new text end new text begin The purpose of this act is to recognize the historic contributions of John Francis "J. Frank" Wheaton, the first African American elected to the Minnesota legislature, by requiring a commemorative work in his honor on the State Capitol grounds. This work will serve as a lasting tribute to Representative Wheaton's legacy in advancing civil rights, racial justice, and public service in Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Findings. new text end new text begin The legislature finds that: new text end new text begin (1) John Francis Wheaton was elected to the Minnesota House of Representatives in 1898 and served from 1899 to 1901; new text end new text begin (2) Representative Wheaton was a strong advocate for civil rights, education, and economic opportunities for African Americans in Minnesota; new text end new text begin (3) Representative Wheaton's leadership paved the way for future African American legislators and civic leaders in the state; and new text end new text begin (4) establishing a permanent tribute to Representative Wheaton at the Minnesota State Capitol will educate the public and inspire future generations. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin DESIGN AND INSTALLATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Design process. new text end new text begin The Capitol Area Architectural and Planning Board must conduct the commemorative works process pursuant to Minnesota Rules, part 2400.2703, and the commissioner of administration must install a commemorative work honoring John Francis Wheaton. The Capitol Area Architectural and Planning Board must issue a public call for artists to ensure an inclusive design process that reflects Wheaton's historical significance. When selecting the final design, the Capitol Area Architectural and Planning Board must consult community leaders, civil rights organizations, historians, and Representative Wheaton's descendants or representatives from the African American community. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Progress report. new text end new text begin The Capitol Area Architectural and Planning Board, in consultation with the commissioner of administration, must provide an annual report to the legislature on the status of the project that addresses project progress, including but not limited to project design, funding, and community engagement efforts. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Completion timeline. new text end new text begin The Capitol Area Architectural and Planning Board must complete the design and site selection phases by December 31, 2026, and the commissioner of administration must complete the installation phase by December 31, 2027. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin EDUCATIONAL, HISTORICAL, AND CULTURAL INITIATIVES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Educational curriculum and public awareness. new text end new text begin The commissioner of education must develop educational materials about John Francis Wheaton's contributions to be incorporated into Minnesota history curricula in primary and secondary schools. The materials must include digital resources, lesson plans, and documentary content for classroom use. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Historical and cultural programs. new text end new text begin The Minnesota Historical Society, in partnership with African American cultural organizations, must: new text end new text begin (1) develop programming, including lectures, exhibits, and panel discussions, to highlight Wheaton's impact; and new text end new text begin (2) establish and promote an annual "J. Frank Wheaton Legacy Day" to commemorate his contributions and encourage civic engagement, particularly among young people. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin FORMAL DEDICATION CEREMONY.new text end new text begin Upon completion of the commemorative work required under this act, the Capitol Area Architectural and Planning Board must host an official dedication ceremony at the Minnesota State Capitol and invite the governor, legislators, representatives of the African American community, educators, historians, and the general public to participate. The ceremony must include historical reflections on Representative Wheaton's legacy, student presentations, and community-led discussions on representation in government. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Capitol Area Architectural and Planning Board. new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Capitol Area Architectural and Planning Board for purposes of this act. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Department of Administration. new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of administration for purposes of this act. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2028. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This act is effective the day following final enactment. new text end